Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.260

Certificated employees of district—Adverse change in contract status—Notice—Probable cause—Review—Appeal.

Every educational service district superintendent or board determining that there is probable cause or causes for a certificated employee or superintendent, hereinafter referred to as employee, of that educational service district to be discharged or otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status shall notify such employee in writing of its decision, which notice shall specify the cause or causes for such action. Such notice shall be served upon that employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. The procedure and standards for review of the decision of the superintendent or board and appeal therefrom shall be as prescribed in discharge cases of teachers in RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and 28A.645.010. The board and the educational service district superintendent, respectively, shall have the duties of the boards of directors and superintendents of school districts in RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and 28A.645.010. Appeals may be filed in the superior court of any county in the educational service district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 281; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 23; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 12; 1971 c 48 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 20. Formerly RCW 28A.21.106.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.